th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งตัวยึดกลองทอม: ยึดติดกลองเบส; ยึดติดขาตั้งฉาบ; ยึดติดตัวกลอง (แบบแขวน/สไตล์ IMS); ยึดติดขากลองฟลอร์ทอม; ยึดตัวรับแกน L; ยึดแคลมป์อเนกประสงค์; ยึดระบบแร็ค; ยึดขาตั้งสแนร์ (ทรงตะกร้า); สากล/หลายตำแหน่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Место установки крепления тома: Крепление на бас-барабан; Крепление на стойку для тарелок; Крепление на корпус барабана (подвес/стиль IMS); Крепление на ножку напольного тома; Крепление под L-образный стержень; Крепление на мультикламп; Крепление на рэковую систему; Крепление на корзину стойки для малого барабана; Универсальное/множество позиций; Другое
tr: Tom montaj pozisyonu: Bas davul bağlantısı; Zil sehpası bağlantısı; Davul kasası bağlantısı (süspansiyon/IMS stili); Floor tom ayak bağlantısı; L-çubuk alıcı bağlantısı; Çoklu kelepçe bağlantısı; Raf sistemi bağlantısı; Trampet sehpası (sepet) bağlantısı; Evrensel/Çoklu pozisyon; Diğer
da: Monteringsposition for tom-holder: Montering på bastromme; Montering på bækkenstativ; Montering på trommekedel (suspension-/IMS-stil); Montering af ben på gulv-tom; Montering til L-stang; Montering med multiklemme; Montering til racksystem; Montering på lilletrommestativ (kurv); Universel/flere positioner; Andet
en: Tom mount mounting position: Bass drum mount; Cymbal stand mount; Drum shell mount (suspension/IMS style); Floor tom leg mount; L-rod receiver mount; Multi-clamp mount; Rack system mount; Snare stand (basket) mount; Universal/Multiple positions; Other
lt-LT: Tomo laikiklio montavimo vieta: Bosinio būgno laikiklis; Lėkščių stovo laikiklis; Būgno korpuso laikiklis (pakabos / IMS stiliaus); Grindinio tomo kojelės laikiklis; L formos strypo imtuvo laikiklis; Daugiafunkcinis spaustuko laikiklis; Rėmo sistemos laikiklis; Mažojo būgno stovo (krepšelio) laikiklis; Universalu / kelios padėtys; Kita
es: Posición de montaje del soporte del tom: Montaje de bombo; Montaje de soporte de platillo; Montaje de casco (estilo suspensión/IMS); Montaje de pata de tom base; Montaje receptor de varilla en L; Montaje de abrazadera múltiple; Montaje de sistema de rack; Montaje de soporte de caja (cesta); Universal/múltiples posiciones; Otro
sl-SI: Položaj montaže nosilca za prehode: Nosilec na bas bobnu; Nosilec na stojalu za činele; Nosilec na obodu bobna (vzmetenje/stil IMS); Nosilec na nogi floor toma; Nosilec za L-palico; Nosilec z večnamensko objemko (multi-clamp); Nosilec za sistem kletke (rack); Nosilec na stojalu za mali boben (košara); Univerzalno/več položajev; Drugo
ko: 톰 마운트 장착 위치: 베이스 드럼 마운트; 심벌 스탠드 마운트; 드럼 셸 마운트(서스펜션/IMS 스타일); 플로어 탐 레그 마운트; L-로드 리시버 마운트; 멀티 클램프 마운트; 랙 시스템 마운트; 스네어 스탠드(바스켓) 마운트; 범용/다중 위치; 기타
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt giá đỡ Tom: Gắn trên trống bass; Gắn trên giá đỡ chũm chọe; Gắn trên vỏ trống (kiểu treo/IMS); Gắn trên chân trống floor tom; Gắn ngàm nhận thanh chữ L; Gắn bằng kẹp đa năng; Gắn trên hệ thống khung; Gắn trên giá đỡ trống snare; Đa năng/Nhiều vị trí; Khác
zh-CN: 嗵鼓安装位置: 低音鼓支架; 镲片架支架; 鼓腔支架（悬挂/IMS 样式）; 落地嗵鼓腿支架; L 形杆接收座; 多功能夹支架; 机架系统安装; 军鼓架（篮式）支架; 通用/多位置; 其他
pt-BR: Suporte de tom posição de montagem: Montagem de bumbo; Montagem em suporte de prato; Montagem no tambor (estilo suspensão/IMS); Montagem na perna do surdo; Montagem do receptor L-rod; Montagem multi-clamp; Montagem em sistema de rack; Montagem no suporte de caixa (cesta); Universal/Várias posições; Outros
nl: Tom mount montagepositie: Basdrumbevestiging; Bekkenstandaardbevestiging; Ketelbevestiging (suspension/IMS-stijl); Floortompootbevestiging; L-rod-ontvangerbevestiging; Multiklembevestiging; Racksysteembevestiging; Snarestandaardbevestiging (mandje); Universeel/meerdere posities; Overige
ro-RO: Poziție de montare a suportului pentru tom: Montare pe tobă bas; Montare pe stativ pentru cinele; Montare pe corpul tobei (stil suspensie/IMS); Montare pe piciorul tomului de podea; Montare cu receptor tijă L; Montare cu clemă multiplă; Montare pe sistem rack; Montare pe stativ de premier (suport); Universal/Poziții multiple; Altele
fi: Tomikiinnikkeen asennussijainti: Bassorummun kiinnitys; Symbaalitelineen kiinnitys; Rummun rungon kiinnitys (jousitus-/IMS-tyyppinen); Lattiatomin jalan kiinnitys; L-sauvan pidikkeen kiinnitys; Monitoimipuristimen kiinnitys; Räkkijärjestelmän kiinnitys; Virvelitelineen (korin) kiinnitys; Yleismalli / useita paikkoja; Muu
nb: Monteringsposisjon for tomfeste: Stortrommefeste; Cymbalstativfeste; Trommeskallfeste (oppheng/IMS-stil); Gulvtom-beinfeste; L-stang-mottakerfeste; Multiklemmefeste; Racksystemfeste; Skarptrommestativfeste (kurv); Universell / flere posisjoner; Annet
it: Posizione di montaggio del supporto del tom: Supporto per grancassa; Supporto per asta del piatto; Supporto per fusto (stile sospensione/IMS); Supporto per gamba del timpano; Supporto ricevitore con asta a L; Supporto con multi-morsetto; Supporto per sistema rack; Supporto (cestello) per rullante; Universale/Posizioni multiple; Altro
hu: Tamtartó rögzítési pozíciója: Lábdobra szerelhető; Cintányérállványra szerelhető; Dobtestre szerelhető (felfüggesztett/IMS stílus); Állótamlábra szerelhető; L-rudas rögzítő; Többpontos bilincses rögzítés; Állványrendszerre szerelhető; Pergőállványra (kosár) szerelhető; Univerzális / több pozíciós; Egyéb
bg-BG: Позиция за монтаж на стойката за том барабан: Монтаж на бас барабан; Монтаж на стойка за чинел; Монтаж на корпуса (тип IMS/окачване); Монтаж на крак за флор том; Монтаж с L-образно рамо; Монтаж с мулти-скоба; Монтаж на рак система; Монтаж на стойка за соло барабан (кошница); Универсални/Множество позиции; Друго
sk-SK: Poloha upevnenia držiaka tom: Uchytenie na basový bubon; Uchytenie na stojan na činely; Uchytenie na korpus bubna (závesné/štýl IMS); Uchytenie na nohy floor tomu; Uchytenie na záchyt s L-tyčou; Uchytenie na multi-svorku; Uchytenie na rampový systém; Uchytenie do stojana na rytmičák (kôš); Univerzálne/viacero polôh; Iné
fr: Position de fixation du support de tom: Montage sur grosse caisse; Montage sur pied de cymbale; Montage sur fût (suspension/IMS); Montage sur pied de tom basse; Montage avec tige en L; Montage multi-pinces; Montage sur système de rack; Montage sur pied de caisse claire (panier); Positions universelles/multiples; Autre
sv: Monteringsposition för pukfäste: Bastrummefäste; Cymbalstativfäste; Trumstommesfäste (fjädrings-/IMS-stil); Golvpukefäste; L-rodsfäste; Multiklämfäste; Racksystemfäste; Virvelstativfäste (korg); Universell/flera positioner; Övrigt
de: Montageposition der Tomhalterung: Bassdrum-Halterung; Beckenständer-Halterung; Kesselhalterung (Freischwing-/IMS-System); Floortom-Beinhalterung; L-Stück-Aufnahmehalterung; Multiklammer-Halterung; Racksystem-Halterung; Snareständer-Halterung; Universell/Mehrere Positionen; Sonstige
zh-TW: 筒鼓安裝位置: 大鼓安裝座; 銅鈸架安裝座; 鼓身安裝座 (懸吊/IMS 款式); 落地鼓腳安裝座; L 型桿接收器安裝座; 多重夾具安裝座; 支架系統安裝座; 小鼓架 (托架) 安裝座; 通用/多個位置; 其他
pl: Pozycja montażowa mocowania tom-tomu: Mocowanie na bębnie basowym; Mocowanie na statywie do talerzy; Mocowanie do korpusu (styl zawieszenia/IMS); Mocowanie na nogach od floor toma; Mocowanie do ramienia typu L-rod; Mocowanie Multi-clamp; Mocowanie na ramie perkusyjnej; Mocowanie w koszu statywu werblowego; Uniwersalne/wiele pozycji; Inne
hr-HR: Položaj za montažu nosača toma: Nosač za bas-bubanj; Nosač za stalak za činele; Nosač za elemente (suspenzijski / stil IMS); Nosač noge za podni tom; Nosač s prijemnikom za šipku L oblika; Nosač s višestrukom stezaljkom; Nosač za sustav stalka (rack); Nosač za stalak doboša (košara); Univerzalno / više položaja; Ostalo
cs: Montážní poloha držáku tomu: Držák na basový buben; Držák na činelový stojan; Držák na korpus bubnu (závěsný/IMS styl); Uchycení nohy floor tomu; Uchycení na L-rameno (L-rod); Uchycení pomocí multi-clamp svorky; Uchycení na rackový systém; Uchycení na stojan malého bubnu (do koše); Univerzální / více pozic; Jiné
ja: タムマウント取付位置: バスドラムマウント; シンバルスタンドマウント; ドラムシェルマウント (サスペンション/IMSスタイル); フロアタムレッグマウント; Lロッドレシーバーマウント; マルチクランプマウント; ラックシステムマウント; スネアスタンド (バスケット) マウント; ユニバーサル/マルチポジション; その他
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης βάσης τομ: Βάση σε κάσα; Βάση σε σταντ πιατινιών; Βάση σε σώμα τυμπάνου (τύπου suspension/IMS); Βάση σε πόδι βαθιού (floor tom); Βάση υποδοχέα L-rod; Βάση multi-clamp; Βάση σε σύστημα rack; Βάση σε σταντ ταμπούρου; Γενικής χρήσης/Πολλαπλών θέσεων; Άλλο
pt-PT: Posição de montagem do suporte de tom: Montagem de bombo; Montagem de suporte de prato; Montagem no corpo da bateria (estilo suspensão/IMS); Montagem de perna de timbalão de chão; Montagem em recetor de haste em L; Montagem com várias abraçadeiras; Montagem em sistema rack; Montagem de suporte de tarola (cesto); Universal/várias posições; Outra